Tennessee, session 114, SB0272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 34-1-108(a), is amended by deleting
the language "sixty (60) days" and substituting instead "ninety (90) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0272
001801
- 1 -